Missouri, session 2026, SB1722.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 621.250, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 621.250,
to read as follows:
621.250. 1. All authority to hear contested case
administrative appeals granted in chapters 236, 256, 260,
444, 640, 643, and 644, and to the hazardous waste
management commission in chapter 260, the Missouri mining
commission in chapter 444, the safe drinking water
commission in chapter 640, the air conservation commission
in chapter 643, and the clean water commission in chapter
644 shall be transferred to the administrative hearing
commission under this chapter. The authority to render
final decisions after hearing on appeals heard by the
administrative hearing commission shall remain with the
commissions listed in this subsection. For appeals pursuant
to chapter 236, chapter 256, section 260.235, or section
260.249, the administrative hearing commission shall render
a final decision rather than a recommended decision. The
administrative hearing commission may render its recommended
or final decision after hearing or through stipulation,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1722 2
consent order, agreed settlement or by disposition in the
nature of default judgment, judgment on the pleadings, or
summary determination, consistent with the requirements of
this subsection and the rules and procedures of the
administrative hearing commission.
2. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person or
entity who is a party to, or who is aggrieved or adversely
affected by, any finding, order, decision, or assessment for
which the authority to hear appeals was transferred to the
administrative hearing commission in subsection 1 of this
section may file a notice of appeal with the administrative
hearing commission within thirty days after any such
finding, order, decision, or assessment is placed in the
United States mail or within thirty days of any such
finding, order, decision, or assessment being delivered,
whichever is earlier. Within ninety days after the date on
which the notice of appeal is filed the administrative
hearing commission may hold hearings, and within one hundred
twenty days after the date on which the notice of appeal is
filed shall make a recommended decision, or a final decision
where applicable, in accordance with the requirements of
this section and the rules and procedures of the
administrative hearing commission; provided, however, that
the dates by which the administrative hearing commission is
required to hold hearings and make a recommended decision
may be extended at the sole discretion of the permittee as
either petitioner or intervenor in the appeal.
3. Any decision by the director of the department of
natural resources that may be appealed as provided in
subsection 1 of this section shall contain a notice of the
right of appeal in substantially the following language:
"If you were adversely affected by this decision, you may be

SB 1722 3
entitled to pursue an appeal before the administrative
hearing commission. To appeal, you must file a petition
with the administrative hearing commission within thirty
days after the date this decision was mailed or the date it
was delivered, whichever date was earlier. If any such
petition is sent by registered mail or certified mail, it
will be deemed filed on the date it is mailed; if it is sent
by any method other than registered mail or certified mail,
it will be deemed filed on the date it is received by the
administrative hearing commission.". Within fifteen days
after the administrative hearing commission renders a
recommended decision, it shall transmit the record and a
transcript of the proceedings, together with the
administrative hearing commission's recommended decision to
the commission having authority to issue a final decision.
The final decision of the commission shall be issued within
one hundred eighty days of the date the notice of appeal in
subsection 2 of this section is filed and shall be based
only on the facts and evidence in the hearing record;
provided, however, that the date by which the commission is
required to issue a final decision may be extended at the
sole discretion of the permittee as either petitioner or
intervenor in the appeal. The commission may adopt the
recommended decision as its final decision. The commission
may change a finding of fact or conclusion of law made by
the administrative hearing commission, or may vacate or
modify the recommended decision issued by the administrative
hearing commission, only if the commission states in writing
the specific reason for a change made under this
subsection. When issuance or denial of a permit is
appealed, and the commission does not issue a final decision
within one hundred eighty days of the date the notice of

SB 1722 4
appeal under subsection 2 of this section is filed or by the
date extended at the sole discretion of the permittee, the
commission shall issue a decision affirming the issuance of
the permit.
4. In the event the person filing the appeal prevails
in any dispute under this section, interest shall be allowed
upon any amount found to have been wrongfully collected or
erroneously paid at the rate established by the director of
the department of revenue under section 32.065.
5. Appropriations shall be made from the respective
funds of the department of natural resources to cover the
administrative hearing commission's costs associated with
these appeals.
6. In all matters heard by the administrative hearing
commission under this section, the burden of proof shall
comply with section 640.012. The hearings shall be
conducted by the administrative hearing commission in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 536 and its
100 regulations promulgated thereunder.
101 7. In any appeal filed by an aggrieved or adversely
102 affected party challenging the issuance of a permit issued
103 by the department of natural resources to a different
104 person, and the commission affirms the issuance of such
105 permit, when the person to whom the permit was issued is a
106 party or intervenor to the appeal, the commission shall
107 award to the permittee reasonable fees, damages, and
108 expenses incurred by the permittee in the civil action or
109 agency proceeding, unless the court or agency finds that the
110 position of the aggrieved or adversely affected party or
111 parties was substantially justified. The permittee may seek
112 award of such reasonable fees, damages, and expenses in the
113 manner provided for in section 536.087.

SB 1722 5
114 [7.] 8. No cause of action or appeal arising out of
115 any finding, order, decision, or assessment of any of the
116 commissions listed in subsection 1 of this section shall
117 accrue in any court unless the party seeking to file such
118 cause of action or appeal shall have filed a notice of
119 appeal and received a final decision in accordance with the
120 provisions of this section.
✓